Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.380

Cooperative watershed management.

In addition to the authority provided in RCW 35.67.020, a city may, as part of maintaining a system sewerage, participate in and expend revenue on cooperative watershed management actions, including watershed management partnerships under RCW 39.34.210 and other intergovernmental agreements, for purposes of water supply, water quality, and water resource and habitat protection and management.

[ 2003 c 327 s 12.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2003 c 327: See note following RCW 39.34.190.